North Carolina, session 2025, SB682.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of six million five hundred thousand dollars ($6,500,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Discovery Place,
Inc., to be used as follows:
(1) One million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) to be used at The
Charlotte Nature Museum for the completion of sidewalks, parking lots, and
electric vehicle charging stations located throughout the property.
(2) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) to be used for the completion of the Tree
Canopy Walk project, including the construction of the walk, safety features,
accessibility improvements, and interpretive educational exhibits at The
Charlotte Nature Museum.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S682-v-1*